Utah statutes.
11-17-5.   Security for bonds -- Provisions in security agreements --
Limitations -- Liens.
(1)  The principal of and interest on any bonds issued under this chapter:
(a)  shall be secured by a pledge and assignment of the revenues out of which
the bonds are made payable or by such other sinking fund or security provision
as shall in the judgment of the governing body be reasonably designed to
assure payment of the obligations to the purchasers thereof; however, the bond
purchasers shall not in any event have recourse against the general funds or
general credit of the governmental offeror;
(b)  may be secured by a mortgage covering all or any part of the project; and
(c)  may be secured by any other security device deemed most advantageous by
the governing body issuing the bonds.
(2)  The proceedings under which the bonds are authorized to be issued under
this chapter and any mortgage given to secure them may contain any agreements
and provisions customarily contained in instruments securing bonds, including,
without limiting the generality of the foregoing, provisions respecting:
(a)  the fixing and collection of revenues for any project covered by the
proceedings or mortgage;
(b)  the terms to be incorporated in the lease, installment purchase
agreement, rental agreement, mortgage, trust indenture, loan agreement,
financing agreement, or other agreement for the project;
(c)  the maintenance and insurance of the project;
(d)  the creation and maintenance of special funds from the revenues of
projects; and
(e)  the rights and remedies available in the event of a default to the
bondholders or to the trustee under a mortgage, all as the governing body
deems advisable and which is not  in conflict with this chapter, except that
in making any agreements or provisions a municipality or county may not
obligate itself except with respect to the project and the application of the
revenues from it and may not incur a general obligation or liability or a
charge upon its general credit or against its taxing powers.
(3)  The proceedings authorizing any bonds under this chapter and any mortgage
securing bonds may provide that, in the event of a default in the payment of
the principal of or the interest on the bonds or in the performance of any
agreement contained in the proceedings or mortgage, payment and performance
may be enforced by the appointment of a receiver with power to charge and
collect the revenues from the project and to apply the revenues from the
project in accordance with the proceedings or the provisions of the mortgage.
(4)  Any mortgage made under this chapter to secure bonds issued under it may
also provide that, in the event of a default in payment or the violation of
any agreement contained in the mortgage, the mortgage may be foreclosed or
otherwise realized on in any manner permitted by law.   The mortgage may also
provide that any trustee under the mortgage or the holder of any of the bonds
secured by the mortgage may become the purchaser at any foreclosure sale if
the highest bidder.  No breach of any agreement imposes any general obligation
or liability upon a municipality or county or any charge upon their general
credit or against their taxing powers.
(5)  The revenues pledged and received are immediately subject to the lien of
the pledge without any physical delivery of any lease, purchase agreement,
financing agreement, loan agreement, note, debenture, bond, or other
obligation under which the revenues are payable, or any other act, except that
the proceedings or agreement by which the pledge is created shall be recorded
in the records of the municipality, county, or state university.  The
proceedings or agreement by which the pledge is created, or a financing
statement, need not be filed or recorded under the Uniform Commercial Code, or
otherwise, except in the records of the municipality, county, or state
university as provided in this Subsection (5).  The lien of any pledge is
valid and binding and has priority as against all parties having claims of any
kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the municipality, county, or
state university, irrespective of whether the parties have notice of the lien.
Each pledge and agreement made for the benefit or security of any of the
revenue bonds issued under this chapter shall continue effective until the
principal, interest, and premium, if any, on the revenue bonds have been fully
paid or provision for payment has been made.
